Alabama, session 2026rs, HB325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE or AI. The term as defined
in Section 17-5-16.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) CHATBOT. A generative artificial intelligence
program with which users can interact by or through an
interface that approximates or simulates conversation through
a text, audio, or visual medium.
(3) CONSUMER. The term as defined in Section 7-1-201,
Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE. A class of AI
models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input
data to generate derived synthetic content, including, but not
limited to, images, video, audio, text, and other digital
content.
Section 2. (a) A person that engages in a commercial
transaction or trade practice with a consumer through an AI
chatbot, in textual or aural conversation, where the consumer
may reasonably believe the consumer is engaging with a human,
shall notify the consumer verbally or in writing:
(1) At the beginning of each interaction that the
consumer is communicating with a computer, not a human; and
(2) At a regular interval for continuing interactions
that the consumer is communicating with computer, not a human.
(b) Failure to comply with the provisions of this act
is an unfair or deceptive trade practice.
Section 3. (a) A consumer who is subjected to a
Page 2

Section 3. (a) A consumer who is subjected to a
HB325 INTRODUCED
commercial transaction that violates Section 2(a) of this act
may bring a civil action to recover the following relief:
(1) Injunctive relief.
(2) Damages in an amount equal to the sum of any actual
damages, as well as statutory damages not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.
(b) In the case of a class action lawsuit, the court
may not award damages in excess of ten million dollars
($10,000,000).
Section 4. Whenever it appears to the Attorney General,
either upon complaint or otherwise, that a person has violated
or is about to violate Section 2(a) of this act, the Attorney
General may bring an action against a person to:
(1) Enjoin the person from continuing the violation;
(2) Seek civil penalties of up to five million dollars
($5,000,000) for a violation under this act; and
(3) Seek any other remedies as the court may deem
appropriate.
Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3